Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1472.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2007-H. Economic and workforce impact review by State-related universities.(a) Legislative findings.--The General Assembly finds as follows:(1) The Commonwealth provides substantial funding to State-related universities.(2) The closure of campuses of institutions of higher education can have severe economic consequences for local 123456789101112131415161718192021 communities.(3) Many regional campuses provide essential workforce training programs, such as nursing and skilled trades, that are critical to this Commonwealth's economy.(4) State-related universities must be held accountable for ensuring that campus closures do not create long-term economic or educational harm.(b) Economic and workforce impact study.--(1) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and continuing each school year thereafter, a board of trustees shall conduct an economic and workforce impact study prior to the closure of a campus within the State-related university.(2) The department shall select an independent research institution to conduct the economic and workforce impact study on behalf of the State-related university.(3) The board of trustees shall transmit the results of the economic and workforce impact study to the following:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(v) The department.(vi) A local government affected by the closure.(vii) Any member of the General Assembly who has an affected campus of the State-related university within the boundaries of the legislative district the member 20250HB1472PN1733 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 represents.(4) The board of trustees may not approve the closure if the economic and workforce impact study reveals that:(i) the closure will result in significant harm to the local community; or(ii) students will not have reasonable and affordable alternatives to receiving postsecondary education.(c) Funding contingency.--It is a condition of receipt of payment from an appropriation to a State-related university that the State-related university has complied with this section.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board of trustees." The board of trustees of a State-related university."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Local government." A county, city, town, borough, township or school district in this Commonwealth."State-related university." The Pennsylvania State University, the University of Pittsburgh, Temple University, Lincoln University and their branch campuses."Student." An individual who is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis at a State-related university.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1472PN1733 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526